HW_Foma/spanish1.lexc
!!!spanish.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +INF  +PRS1SG  +PRS2SG  +PRS3SG  +PRS1PL  +PRS2PL  +PRS3PL

LEXICON Root

Verb ;

LEXICON Verb

pedir Vinf;
medir Vinf;
renir Vinf;


LEXICON Vinf

+INF:+ir             #;
+PRS1SG:+o      #;
+PRS2SG:+es      #;
+PRS3SG:+e  #;
+PRS1PL:+imos #;
+PRS2PL:+Is #;
+PRS3PL:+en #;
